Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE I. WATER CONTROL AND IMPROVEMENT DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 9069. HARRIS COUNTY WATER CONTROL AND IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT NO. 159

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 9069.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "district" means the Harris County Water Control and Improvement District No. 159.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 833 (H.B. 4203), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2015.

Sec. 9069.002. FINDINGS OF PUBLIC PURPOSE AND BENEFIT. (a) The district is created to serve a public purpose and benefit.

(b) The district is created to accomplish the purposes of a water control and improvement district as provided by general law and Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 833 (H.B. 4203), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER B. SUBSTITUTION OF LAND

Sec. 9069.051. SUBSTITUTING LAND OF AT LEAST EQUAL VALUE. After the district is organized and has obtained voter approval for the issuance of, or has sold, bonds payable wholly or partly from ad valorem taxes, land within the district boundaries subject to taxation that does not need or utilize the services of the district may be excluded and other land not within the boundaries of the district may be included within the boundaries of the district without impairment of the security for payment of the bonds or invalidation of any prior bond election, as provided by this section and Sections 54.740 through 54.747, Water Code.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 833 (H.B. 4203), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2015.

Sec. 9069.052. CONSTRUCTION OF SUBCHAPTER. This subchapter shall be construed to supplement and not to supplant the provisions of general law applicable to the exclusion of land from the district or the inclusion of land within the district.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 833 (H.B. 4203), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2015.